New Mexico, session 2026, HB256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. Section 22-33-6 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2025,
Chapter 129, Section 3) is amended to read:
"22-33-6. CARDIAC EMERGENCY RESPONSE PLAN--AUTOMATED
EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATOR.--
A. Each school shall develop and implement a
cardiac emergency response plan that addresses the
appropriate use of school personnel who are to respond to
incidents involving a person experiencing a sudden cardiac
arrest or a similar life-threatening emergency while on
school grounds or during a school athletic activity. Each
cardiac emergency response plan shall:
(1) be developed and implemented using core
elements that are nationally recognized and evidence-based;

(2) identify specific school personnel who

will take action when a person experiences a sudden cardiac

arrest or a similar life-threatening emergency;

(3) establish protocols for school personnel

identified by the cardiac emergency response plan to follow

when a person experiences a sudden cardiac arrest or a
HB 256
Page 1

similar life-threatening emergency;
(4) determine appropriate locations for
automated external defibrillators to be installed or made
available;
(5) provide for routine maintenance of the
automated external defibrillator; and
(6) be updated when necessary to be
consistent with evidence-based guidelines.
B. Every school in the state shall install an
automated external defibrillator. Installed automated
external defibrillators shall be maintained and tested
according to the manufacturer's operational guidelines.
C. An automated external defibrillator shall be
clearly marked and easily accessible during each school
athletic activity.
D. The department shall adopt and promulgate rules
for the training of school employees on the use of automated

external defibrillators in a manner consistent with standards

adopted by the American heart association.

E. The requirements of Subsections A and B of this

section shall be fulfilled by all:

(1) public non-charter high schools no later

than the 2026-2027 school year; and

(2) elementary schools, middle schools,

charter schools and private schools no later than the 2027-
HB 256
Page 2

2028 school year.
F. As used in this section, "school athletic
activity" means a sport or activity organized by a school or
school district that involves a physical game or competition
against another team, club or entity or practice or
preparation for the physical game or competition." HB 256
Page 3